Massachusetts, session 194th, S2491.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 115 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby 
amended by inserting after Section 2C the following:-   
Section 2D. Program to further enhance employment opportunities and outcomes among 
veterans  
The commissioner shall authorize reimbursement to Veterans for costs associated with 
taking municipal civil service exams. The commissioner shall authorize no more than three 
reimbursements per Veteran, provided further, no reimbursement shall be authorized if the 
Veteran fails a subsequent exam. The commissioner shall engage with interested stakeholders 
and organizations that provide services to veterans in the development of the program.